Connecticut, session 2026, SB00524.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding any provision
of the general statutes, the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental
Protection shall convey to The Congregational Church of Easton, Inc., a
parcel of land located in the town of Easton, at a cost equal to the
administrative costs of making such conveyance. Said parcel of land has
an area of approximately 6.85 acres and is identified as Lots 30 and 34
in Block 3776B on town of Easton Tax Assessor's Map 1557, and is
further described in a deed recorded in the town of Easton Land Records
in Volume 0382 at Page 0279. The conveyance shall be subject to the
approval of the State Properties Review Board.
(b) The Congregational Church of Easton, Inc., shall use said parcel
of land for purposes of open space and two small butterfly gardens-
pollinator pathways. If the church:
(1) Does not use said parcel for either of said purposes;
LCO No. 3615 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 524
(2) Does not retain ownership of all of said parcel; or
(3) Leases all or any portion of said parcel,
the parcel shall revert to the state of Connecticut.
(c) The State Properties Review Board shall complete its review of the
conveyance of said parcel of land not later than thirty days after it
receives a proposed agreement from the Department of Energy and
Environmental Protection. The land shall remain under the care and
control of said department until a conveyance is made in accordance
with the provisions of this section. The State Treasurer shall execute and
deliver any deed or instrument necessary for a conveyance under this
section, which deed or instrument shall include provisions to carry out
the purposes of subsection (b) of this section. The Commissioner of
Energy and Environmental Protection shall have the sole responsibility
for all other incidents of such conveyance.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section